Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.170

Plan for federal area.

Whenever the director finds that it will be in the interest of the emergency management of this state or of the United States, the director may, with the approval of the governor, agree with the federal government, or any agency thereof carrying on activities within this state, upon a plan of emergency management applicable to a federally owned area, which plan may or may not conform to all of the other provisions of this chapter with the view to integrating federally owned areas into the comprehensive plan and program of the emergency management of this state. Such plan may confer upon persons carrying out such plan any or all of the rights, powers, privileges and immunities granted employees or representatives of the state and/or its political subdivisions by this chapter. The plan of emergency management authorized under this section may not include preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.

[ 1986 c 266 s 30; 1984 c 38 s 16; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 19; 1951 c 178 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.